New Jersey, session 221, A1962.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The Attorney General shall allocate and utilize resources in the Department of Law and Public Safety to perform functions designed to address the specific needs and vulnerabilities related to human trafficking which are experienced by members of underserved communities, particularly girls and women of color. b.  The functions to be performed pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall include, but not be limited to: (1)  coordinating with State, municipal, and county law enforcement agencies to investigate cases related to human trafficking in underserved communities; (2)  coordinating with relevant government entities, including, but not limited to the Victims of Crime Compensation Office, established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2007, c.95 (C.52:4B-3.2) and the Commission on Human Trafficking, established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2013, c.51 (C.52:17B-237), and community-based organizations to create and administer programs to connect victims to appropriate and effective information and resources; and (3)  collecting and maintaining data related to human trafficking cases and trends concerning members of underserved communities. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.